Texas, session 892, HB133.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subchapter HH, Chapter 481, Government Code, as effective September 1, 2025, is repealed. SECTION 2.  Any money appropriated to the Texas Quantum Initiative is redirected to the Texas Education Agency for the state fiscal biennium beginning September 1, 2025, to reduce the state compression percentage under Section 48.255, Education Code, to the lowest possible percentage. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.